District of Columbia statutes.
7-503.01

Establishment.

There is established an Office on Aging. The Office shall provide within the District government a single administrative unit, responsible to the Mayor, to administer the provisions of the Older Americans Act (P.L. 89-73, as amended), and such other programs as shall be delegated to it by the Mayor or the Council of the District of Columbia, and to promote the welfare of the aged.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title III, § 301, 22 DCR 2457
Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 9(b)(1), 28 DCR 3425
This section is referenced in § 1-603.01, § 7-502.01, § 7-503.06, and § 7-701.01.
1981 Ed., § 6-2211.
1973 Ed., § 6-1711.
For temporary (90 days) requirement that the Mayor submit quarterly reports to the Council on programs and operations within the Office on Aging, see § 6062 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
The “Older Americans Act” is codified at 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.
Section 1042 of D.C. Law D.C. Law 21-36 provided that, in Fiscal Year 2016, beginning October 1, 2015, the Mayor shall submit quarterly reports to the Council on programs and operations within the Office on Aging, and detailed the contents required in each report.